Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Certification of Occupational Therapists and Assistants

63-13-201. Legislative purpose.

This part is enacted to:

Safeguard the public health, safety and welfare;

Protect the public from being misled by incompetent, unscrupulous and unauthorized persons;

Assure the highest degree of professional conduct on the part of occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants; and

Assure that the available occupational therapy services are of high quality to persons in need of such services.

It is the purpose of this part to provide for the regulation of persons offering occupational therapy services to the public.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-13-301; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 7, provided that all rules, regulations, procedures and practices in effect under the former Physical Therapy Practice Act formerly compiled in §§ 63-13-101 — 63-13-115 and under the State Occupational Therapy Practice Act, formerly compiled in §§ 63-21-101 — 63-21-111, shall continue in effect until such time as the state board of occupational and physical therapy examiners takes appropriate action to modify the rules, regulations, procedures or practices. Assets, liabilities, contracts, property, records and unexpended balances of appropriations or other funds employed, held by, or available to the board of physical therapy examiners are transferred to the board of occupational and physical therapy examiners. All disciplinary actions arising from conduct prohibited by former title 63, ch. 13, part 1 or former title 63, ch. 21, part 1, prior to July 1, 1984, shall be maintained, or subject to action, by the board of occupational and physical therapy examiners according to the laws in effect at the time the prohibited conduct occurred.

Former part 2, §§ 63-13-201 — 63-13-205, was transferred to part 1 in 1986.

63-13-202. Applicants for licensure — Qualifications — Examinations.

An applicant for licensure as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant shall file an application showing, to the satisfaction of the board of occupational therapy, that the applicant:

Is of good moral character;

Has successfully completed the academic requirements of an educational program accredited by ACOTE or its predecessor organization. The accredited program shall be a program for occupational therapists or a program for occupational therapy assistants, depending upon the category of licensure for which the applicant is applying;

Has successfully completed the period of supervised fieldwork experience required by ACOTE; and

Has made an acceptable score on a written or computerized examination designed to test the applicant's knowledge of the basic and clinical services related to occupational therapy, occupational therapy techniques and methods and other subjects that may help to determine an applicant's fitness to practice. The board of occupational therapy shall approve an examination for occupational therapists and an examination for occupational therapy assistants and shall establish standards for acceptable performance on each examination. The board is authorized to use the entry level national examinations prepared and administered by NBCOT as the examinations used to test applicants for licensure as occupational therapists or occupational therapy assistants and is authorized to use the standards of NBCOT in determining an acceptable score on each examination.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-13-302; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 4; 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 63-13-201 — 63-13-205, was transferred to part 1 in 1986.

Cross-References. Licensure, § 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-13-203. Determining qualifications of applicants — Granting licenses and permits.

In determining the qualifications of an applicant for licensure as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant, only a majority vote of the board of occupational therapy shall be required.

Licenses and permits issued by the board shall be granted by the board as provided in § 63-13-204.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-13-303; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 63-13-201 — 63-13-205, was transferred to part 1 in 1986.

63-13-204. Licenses — Issuance — Fees — Revocation — Reinstatement — Renewal.

The board of occupational therapy shall issue a license to any person who meets the requirements of this part upon payment of the appropriate fees.

Each licensed occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant shall pay a biennial renewal fee to the board as prescribed in this part, payable in advance, for the ensuing years. The secretary of the board shall notify each licensee.

When any licensee fails to register and pay the biennial registration fee within thirty (30) days after registration becomes due as provided in this section, the license of such person shall be administratively revoked at the expiration of the thirty (30) days after the registration was required, without further notice or hearing. Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in this section may make application in writing to the board for the reinstatement of such license; and, upon good cause being shown, the board in its discretion may reinstate such license upon payment of all past-due renewal fees.

For purposes of implementing § 63-13-108(b) [repealed], the board shall prescribe and publish nonrefundable fees.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period; however, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board shall determine that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the biennial fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (c).

The board is authorized to establish requirements for assessing continued competence of licensees.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-13-304; Acts 1989, ch. 360, §§ 43, 44; 1989, ch. 523, § 32; 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2003, ch. 109, § 1; 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-204 was transferred to § 63-13-104 in 1986 and was later transferred to 63-13-108 in 1999 before being repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 115, § 2, effective July 1, 2007.

Former § 63-13-108, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 115, § 2, effective July 1, 2007.

63-13-205. Limited permits — Failure of initial examination.

A limited permit may be issued by the board to an applicant who has applied for a license under § 63-13-202, has successfully completed the educational and field experience requirements of § 63-13-202(2) and (3) and is scheduled to take the examination required by § 63-13-202(4).

An applicant who has received a limited permit shall take the examination within ninety (90) days of the date the applicant received the limited permit. If the applicant does not take the examination within that ninety-day period, the limited permit expires at the end of the ninety-day period.

If an applicant fails the examination, the applicant's limited permit expires upon the board's receipt of notice that the applicant failed the examination.

If an applicant passes the examination, the applicant's limited permit remains effective until the board grants or denies a license to the applicant.

An applicant may obtain a limited permit only once.

A limited permit allows an applicant to engage in occupational therapy practice under the supervision of a licensed occupational therapist.

The board shall adopt rules governing the supervision of persons to whom a limited permit has been issued. The rules shall address, at a minimum, initial and periodic inspections, written evaluations, written treatment plans, patient notes and periodic evaluation of performance.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-13-305; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 5; 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-205 was transferred to § 63-13-105 in 1986 and was later transferred to 63-13-102 in 1999.

63-13-206. Supervision of an occupational therapy assistant by an occupational therapist.

A licensed occupational therapy assistant shall practice under the supervision of an occupational therapist who is licensed in Tennessee.

The supervising occupational therapist is responsible for all services provided by the occupational therapy assistant, including, but not limited to, the formulation and implementation of a plan of occupational therapy services for each client, and has a continuing responsibility to follow the progress of each client and to ensure the effective and appropriate supervision of the occupational therapy assistant according to the needs of the client.

The supervising occupational therapist shall assign to the occupational therapy assistant only those duties and responsibilities that the occupational therapy assistant is qualified to perform.

The board shall adopt rules governing the supervision of occupational therapy assistants by occupational therapists. Those rules may address the following:

The manner in which the supervising occupational therapist oversees the work of the occupational therapy assistant;

The ratio of occupational therapists to occupational therapy assistants required under different conditions and in different practice settings; and

The documentation of supervision contacts between the supervising occupational therapist and the occupational therapy assistant.

The rules adopted by the board shall recognize that the frequency, methods and content of supervision of occupational therapy assistants by occupational therapists may vary by practice setting and are dependent upon the following factors, among others:

Complexity of the client's needs;

Number and diversity of clients;

Skills of the occupational therapy assistant and the supervising occupational therapist;

Type of practice setting; and

Requirements of the practice setting.

Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-206, concerning construction of part and activities not prohibited, was transferred to § 63-13-208 in 1999.

63-13-207. Delegation of tasks to unlicensed personnel.

A licensed physician, occupational therapist or licensed occupational therapy assistant may delegate to an unlicensed person specific routine tasks associated with nontreatment aspects of occupational therapy practice that are not evaluative, assessive, task selective or recommendational in nature and do not require making decisions or making assessment or treatment entries in official patient records, if the following conditions are met:

The physician, occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant accepts professional responsibility for the performance of that duty by the person to whom it is delegated. In the case of duties delegated by an occupational therapy assistant, the occupational therapy assistant, the physician and occupational therapist who supervises the occupational therapy assistant shall be responsible;

The unlicensed person does not perform any duties that require licensure under this chapter; and

The physician, occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant ensures that the unlicensed person has been appropriately trained for the performance of the tasks.

Tasks that may be delegated may include:

Transporting of patients;

Preparing or setting up a work area or equipment;

Routine department maintenance or housekeeping activities;

Taking care of patient's personal needs during treatments; and

Clerical, secretarial or administrative duties.

Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-207, concerning denial, suspension or revocation of certificate, was transferred to § 63-13-209 in 1999.

63-13-208. Construction of part — Activities not prohibited.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as preventing or restricting the practice, services or activities of:

Any person licensed under any chapter of this title;

Any person employed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant by an agency of the United States government while providing occupational therapy services in that capacity;

Any person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree or certificate in occupational therapy in an educational program accredited or granted developing program status by ACOTE, if:

The activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study; and

The person is designated by a title that clearly indicates the person's status as a student;

Any person fulfilling the supervised fieldwork experience requirements of § 63-13-202(3), if the activities and services constitute a part of the experience necessary to meet the requirements of § 63-13-202(3);

An occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant who is licensed or certified to practice in another state that has licensure or certification requirements at least as stringent as the requirements of this part while in Tennessee for the purpose of providing educational, consulting or training services for no more than fourteen (14) days in a calendar year; and

Any person who is certified by the National Council for Therapeutic Recreation Certification as a certified therapeutic recreation specialist, while engaged in practicing the profession of recreation therapy.

Nothing in this part shall prevent certified orthotists from designing, fabricating and fitting orthotic devices.

Nothing in this part shall prevent any person employed by a physician from performing activities related to casting and splinting or teaching exercises related to specific treatment by the employing physician.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-13-306; Acts 1994, ch. 901, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-13-206; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-208, concerning administrative procedure, was transferred to § 63-13-210 in 1999.

63-13-209. Denial, suspension or revocation of license.

The board of occupational therapy has the power and it is its duty to deny, suspend or revoke the license of or to otherwise lawfully discipline a licensee whenever the licensee is guilty of violating any of this part or is guilty of any of the following acts or offenses:

Unprofessional, dishonorable or unethical conduct;

Violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this part or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant thereto or any criminal statute of this state;

Making false or misleading statements or representations, being guilty of fraud or deceit in obtaining admission to practice or being guilty of fraud or deceit in the licensee's practice;

Gross health care liability or a pattern of continued or repeated health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of professional practice;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of any drugs or the use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues or other drugs or stimulants in such a manner as to adversely affect the person's ability to practice;

Conviction of a felony, conviction of any offense under state or federal drug laws or conviction of any offense involving moral turpitude;

Making or signing in one's professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time one makes or signs such certificate;

Engaging in practice when mentally or physically unable to safely do so;

Solicitation by agents or persons generally known as “cappers” or “steerers” of professional patronage or profiting by the acts of those representing themselves to be agents of the licensee;

Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide fees received for professional services with any person for bringing or referring a patient;

Conducting practice so as to permit, directly or indirectly, an unlicensed person to perform services or work that, under this part, can be done legally only by persons licensed to practice;

Professional connection or association with any person, firm or corporation in any manner in an effort to avoid and circumvent this part or lending one's name to another for illegal practice;

Payment or acceptance of commissions, in any form or manner, on fees for professional services, references, consultations, pathological reports, prescriptions or on other services or articles supplied to patients;

Giving of testimonials, directly or indirectly, concerning the supposed virtue of secret therapeutic agents or proprietary preparations, such as remedies, or other articles or materials that are offered to the public, claiming radical cure or prevention of diseases by their use;

Violating the code of ethics adopted by the board;

Any other unprofessional or unethical conduct that may be specified by the rules duly published and promulgated by the board or the violation of any provision of this part;

On behalf of the licensee, the licensee's partner, associate or any other person affiliated with the licensee or the licensee's facility, use or participate in the use of any form of public communication containing a false, fraudulent, misleading or deceptive statement or claim; or

Disciplinary action against a person licensed to practice occupational therapy by another state or territory of the United States for any acts or omissions that would constitute grounds for discipline of a person licensed in this state. A certified copy of the initial or final order or other equivalent document memorializing the disciplinary action from the disciplining state or territory shall constitute prima facie evidence of violation of this section and be sufficient grounds upon which to deny, restrict or condition licensure or renewal and/or discipline a person licensed in this state.

In enforcing this section, the board of occupational therapy shall, upon probable cause, have the authority to compel an applicant or licensee to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both, by a designated board of at least three (3) practicing physicians, including a psychiatrist, where a question of mental condition is involved. The applicant or licensee may have an independent physical or mental examination, which examination report shall be filed with the board for consideration. The physicians' board shall submit a report of its findings to the board for use in any hearing that may thereafter ensue.

The board, on its own motion, may cause to be investigated any report indicating that a licensee is or may be in violation of this part. Any licensee, any occupational therapist or occupational therapy-related society or association or any other person who in good faith reports to the board any information that a licensee is or may be in violation of any provisions of this part shall not be subject to suit for civil damages as a result thereof.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-307, 63-13-207; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 9; 2007, ch. 115, §§ 7, 8; 2012, ch. 798, § 46; 2012, ch. 848, § 77; 2018, ch. 745, § 30.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-209, concerning unlawful practices and penalty, was transferred to § 63-13-211 in 1999.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

63-13-210. Administrative procedure.

All administrative proceedings for disciplinary action against a licensee under this part shall be conducted by the board of occupational therapy in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-308, 63-13-208; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-210, concerning certification requirement, was transferred to § 63-13-212 in 1999.

63-13-211. Unlawful practices — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to violate this part. It is unlawful for any person who is not licensed under this part as an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant or whose license has been suspended or revoked to use, in connection with the person's name or place of business, the words “occupational therapist,” “occupational therapist registered,” “licensed occupational therapist,” “occupational therapy assistant,” “certified occupational therapy assistant” or “licensed occupational therapy assistant,” the letters “OT,” “OTA,” “OTR,” “OT/L,” “OTA/L” or “COTA” or any other words, letters, abbreviations or insignia indicating or implying that the person is an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant or who in any way, orally, in writing, in print or by sign, directly or by implication, claims to be an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant.

A violation of this part is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-13-309; Acts 1989, ch, 591, § 112; T.C.A. § 63-13-209; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-211, concerning reciprocity and waiver of requirements, was transferred to § 63-13-213 in 1999.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-13-212. License requirement.

No person shall practice occupational therapy or act as an occupational therapy assistant, nor claim to be able to practice occupational therapy or act as an occupational therapy assistant, unless the person holds a license and otherwise complies with this part and the rules adopted by the board.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-310, 63-13-210; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-212, concerning foreign-trained applicants, was transferred to § 63-13-214 in 1999.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-13-213. Reciprocity.

The board of occupational therapy may grant a license to an applicant who presents proof of current licensure or certification as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in another state, the District of Columbia or a territory of the United States and who possesses educational and experiential qualifications that meet or exceed the requirements for licensure in Tennessee, as determined by the board of occupational therapy.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-311, 63-13-211; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 11; 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-13-213, concerning retirement, was transferred to § 63-13-215 in 1999.

63-13-214. Internationally trained applicants.

Applicants for licensure who have completed educational programs outside the United States shall furnish proof of good moral character and of completion of an educational program and supervised fieldwork substantially similar to those contained in § 63-13-202(2) and (3) and shall satisfy the examination requirements of § 63-13-202(4).

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-312, 63-13-212; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 12.

63-13-215. Retirement — Inactive status.

Any person licensed by the board of occupational therapy to practice in this state who has retired or may retire from such practice in this state shall not be required to register as required by this chapter if such person files with the board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which the person retired from such practice and any other facts, as the board shall consider necessary, that tend to verify such retirement. If such person thereafter reengages in practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet such continuing education requirements that are established by the board, except for good and sufficient reasons as determined by the board.

Any person licensed by the board of occupational therapy may place the person's license on inactive status by filing the proper forms with the board and by paying a biennial fee in accordance with rules adopted by the board. If the person thereafter reengages in active practice in this state, the person shall apply for relicensure with the board as provided by this part and shall meet the continuing education requirements that are established by the board, except for good and sufficient reasons as determined by the board.

Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-313, 63-13-213; Acts 1999, ch. 415, § 2; 2006, ch. 765, § 13; 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

Cross-References. Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-13-216. Board of occupational therapy.

There is created a board of occupational therapy, which shall perform the same functions and have the same duties and responsibilities that were performed by the committee of occupational therapy prior to July 1, 2007.

The board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor, each of whom shall be a resident of this state. Three (3) members of the board shall be licensed occupational therapists who have had at least five (5) years of experience in the actual practice or teaching of occupational therapy immediately preceding their appointment. One (1) member of the board shall be a licensed occupational therapy assistant who has had at least five (5) years of experience in the actual practice of occupational therapy or teaching of an occupational therapy assistant curriculum immediately preceding the appointment. One (1) member of the board shall be a person who is not engaged in the practice of occupational therapy and who is not professionally or commercially associated with the health care industry.

The occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant members may be appointed by the governor from lists of nominees submitted by interested occupational therapy groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Occupational Therapy Association. The governor shall consult with the interested occupational therapy groups to determine qualified persons to fill positions on the board.

The occupational therapists and the occupational therapy assistant who are serving on the committee of occupational therapy on July 1, 2007, shall continue to serve as members of the board until the expiration of their terms.

The board shall organize annually and select a chair and a secretary. Meetings shall be held as frequently as may be required.

A quorum of the board shall consist of at least three (3) members.

The division shall provide administrative, investigatory and clerical services to the board.

Each member of the board shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties on the board and shall be entitled to a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of service in conducting the business of the board. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

All regular appointments to the board shall be for terms of three (3) years each. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The governor may, at the request of the board, remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetence or neglect of duty.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) member is sixty (60) years of age or older, that at least one (1) member is a racial minority and that the gender balance of the board reflects the gender balance of the state's population.

The board shall have the power and duty to:

Promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, all rules reasonably necessary for the performance of its duties and the proper administration of this part;

Grant, in the board's name, all licenses approved by the board; and

Collect and receive all fees, fines and moneys owed pursuant to this part and to pay the fees, fines and moneys into the general fund of the state.

After July 1, 2007, the board shall assume and fulfill all powers and duties previously assigned to the committee of occupational therapy, and the rules adopted by the committee of occupational therapy shall become the rules of the board without further action by the board.

Acts 2007, ch. 115, § 9; 2014, ch. 603, § 3; 2017, ch. 211, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The board of occupational therapy, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (c), substituted “may be appointed” for “shall be appointed” in the first sentence, and substituted “with the interested occupational therapy groups” for “with such interested groups” in the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 211, § 4. April 28, 2017.